lt-LT: Diržo tipas: Penkių taškų; Juosmens; Trijų taškų; Kita
nb: Beltetype: Fempunkt; Runde; Tre-poeng; Annet
tr: Kemer Tipi: Beş delikli; Kucak; Üç delikli; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo do sino: Cinco pontos; Colo; Três pontos; Outro
cs: Typ pásu: Pětibodový; Klínový; Tříbodový; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta pojasa: Pet točaka; Oko struka; Tri točke; Ostalo
zh-CN: 系带类型: 五点式; 绕圈; 三点式; 其他
ko: 벨트 유형: 5점식; 랩; 3점식; 기타
es: Tipo de cinturón: Cinco puntos; Campana; Tres puntos; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de cinto: Cinco pontos; Abdominal; Três pontos; Outro
ro-RO: Tip centură: Cinci puncte; Abdominală; Trei puncte; Altele
sk-SK: Typ pásu: Päťbodový; Bedrový; Trojbodový; Iné
hu: Öv típusa: Ötpontos; Medenceöv; Hárompontos; Egyéb
it: Tipo di cintura: Cinque punti; Giro; Tre punti; Altro
nl: Riemtype: Vijfpunts; Schoot; Driepunts; Andere
sv: Typ av bälte: Fem hål; Knä; Tre hål; Övrigt
ja: ベルトタイプ: ファイブポイント; ラップ; スリーポイント; その他
pl: Typ pasa: Pięciopunktowy; Biodrowy; Trzypunktowy; Inne
el: Τύπος ζώνης: Πέντε σημείων; Κάτω του υπογαστρίου; Τριών σημείων; Άλλο
vi: Loại dây an toàn: 5 điểm; Vòng; Ba điểm; Khác
fi: Vyötyyppi: Viisipisteinen; Syli; Kolmipisteinen; Muu
en: Belt type: Five-point; Lap; Three-point; Other
da: Bæltetype: Fempunkts; Skød; Trepunkts; Andet
de: Gurttyp: Fünfpunkt; Schoß; Dreipunkt; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทเข็มขัด: ห้าจุด; พาดตัก; สามจุด; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип ремня: Пятиточечный; Поясной; Трехточечный; Другой
zh-TW: 皮帶類型: 五點式; 安全帶; 三點式; 其他
fr: Type de ceinture: Pointe fine; Genoux; Trois points; Autre
bg-BG: Тип колан: Пет точки; Кръг; Три точки; Други
sl-SI: Vrsta pasu: Pet-točkovni; Varnostni; Tritočkovni; Drugo